ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/sl_SI/hyph_sl_SI.dic
3sledice
sledi1c
3sledicam
sledi1ca
3sledico
s1lep1l
s1la2n.
s3lane.
sla3ne
3sla1nec
s1la1na
s1la3no
s3lan2i.
sla3ni
s1la2n2s
3slancev
s4lance
sla2n1c
3slanci
1s2lav1j
s1la1t
sla1bl
s1lo1n2j
1slov1n
3slo1v2a
2s1lovom
slo1vo
1slo1p
s3li2l.
s1li
s3li1li
1slu1gi
3služen
slu1že
3služ2i.
slu1ži
3služi2l.
3služij
1sluj
3sluša3nje
s1luš
s4lušan
slu1ša
sluša1n2j
s4lji1vo
sl2j
3sljivos
1s2h
st2
2s2t.
1s2tek
ste3kle
ste3kla
s1tel
3s2te2l2j.
stel2j
1stec
3stno2s2t.
st2nost2
3stno3stih
3s2tnos2t3m
3stnik
3stni3št1v2a
stništ2v
1sta2n.
2stan1k
3stanje2n.
sta1n2j
sta3nje
3stanje1ne
1s4tavk
4sta1vo
3stavit2v
s4tavi1t
sta3vi
4s1tavim
1sta1vu1
3sta3vljenos
stavl2j
stavlje1no
s4tavlj2a.
4sta4v3lja1li
4stav1lja1t
3starejše.
sta1re
starej1š
starej1še
3starejših
starej1ši
1sta1b
3stam
1sta2j.
3staja3nje
sta1ja
staja1n2j
3staja3nja
3staja1le
3stajališ
staja1li
2s2t1k
1sto1re
3stornin
stor1n
1sto1ro
1sto1ri
1sto1ru
1stor1s2
4s1top1na
3s2to1pnih
stop3ništ
4sto1po
2sto1p2i.
sto1pi
3sto1pih
1stol1n
1stol1s
stos3ti
stost2
1stobo
sto1b
1stoj
3sto1je
3stoj1n
4stojn2o.
3sto1ju
3s2toši2l.
s1toš
sto1ši
1stvi1c
st2v
st1vi
4strelil
stre1li
stre3zno
3stranite
stra3ni
strani1t
3strani1mo
3stranij
3stransko
stra2n1s
stransk2
3stranje2n.
stra1n2j
stra3nje
3stranjenim
st4ranje1ni
1stra1t
3stra1šu
3straci1ja
stra1c
stros3ti
strost2
1st2rv
3strupi1t
stru1pi3
s1tr2g2
str2t
str2mog
str1mo
1stin
1stik
s1tikr
1stil1n
4sti1li
sti1s
3stitel
sti1t
1stič
1stiž
3sti2c.
sti1c
3stici
1stum
4stli2n.
st1li
4stli1na
stljivos3ti
s4tlji1vo
stl2j
stljivost2
3stja2n.
st2j
3stja3ne
s1b
s1me1g
1sme2h.
3smehne
smeh1n
1smej
1smeš
1smi1se
s1mi
s2mim
2s1j
2s1f
2t.
1tenos
te1no
tenos3ti
tenost2
te1ko
tek3l2o.
1tev1n
4tevam
te1v2a
te1d
te3gni1la
te1g
te2gn
te3gni1lo
te1le
telnos3
tel1n
tes1na
tes1no
tes3n2i.
tes3nih
te1sk2
te1st2
1te2t.
te1tn
1te1ta
1te1ti
tet3je.
tet2j
te3tjem
te1tja
tet3ju
te1b2la
teb1l
tem3ne.
tem1no
4te1jo
te1š
t1než
2tnos2tm
tnost2
4tni1ke
t4nikov.
tni1ko
1tni1t
tni1šk
1tnje
tn2j
t1nja
1tanet
ta3ne
1ta1neš
1tanav1
ta1na
1tanke
tan1k
2tankov
1tanki
3tanov2i.
ta3no
tano1vi
3tanovi2l.
3tanovi1li
3tanovita
tanovi1t
3tanov3lje1na
tanovl2j
3tanov3lje1no
1tanil
ta3ni
tani3t
1tanim
tanč4
3tanje1na
ta1n2j
ta3nje
1tak
ta1k2n2j
tak1n
ta3kr
ta4k3ra2t.
takra1t
4ta1ve
4tav2a.
ta1v2a
1tavam
4tavk
1tavon
ta1vo
ta1vr
4tavi1t
ta3vi
1tavim
1taviš
4tavlje1ne
tavl2j
ta3vljenos
tavlje1no
ta1p
talnos3
tal1n
3tali1la
ta1li
3ta1li1li
4talih
tali1š
tal1s
1ta1l2j
ta1b
ta1z
tajno1
taj1n
3taja3nju
ta1ja
taja1n2j
3tajal2i.
taja1li
taj1s
ta1f
2t1k
t3k2a.
tkos3ti
tkost2
t3kr
to1ne
tonos3ne
to1no
3tono1sna
1to1n2j
1to1a
to1ko
tok1r
to1ku
to1ks
3tova3no
to1v2a
tovos3ti
to1vo
tovost2
to1vr1
to3vlje1na
tovl2j
to3vski
tov2s
tovsk2
1tor.
1torna
tor1n
1torno
3torn2i.
3tornih
1tor2a.
to1ra
tor1s2
1to1i
to1g
4to2p.
to1pe
to1pne
1top1na
2to1pnih
to1pa
4to1p2a.
to1po
to1pi
to1pl
1tolov
to1lo
1tolih
to1li
toli1š
to3srčnos4
tosrč2
tosrč1n
to1tn
to1če
1to1ča1
to1čj
to1b
1to1be
1to1ba
t1obro
1tobi
to1me
1to1ma
3tojanstve
to1ja
tojan4st2
toja2n1s
tojanst2v
tojiš1
to1ji
1toš
2toši2l.
to1ši
to1c
toce1
t2v
2tven
tvarno3
t1v2a
tvar1n
t4varja1t
tvar1j
2t3vam
tvos1
3tresen
tre1se
tre1sn
1tre1su
1trest2
t1reč
1tre2b.
3tre1ben
tre1be
3trebam
tre1ba
3trebova2l.
tre1bo
tre1bov
trebo1v2a
2t1re1mu
4tre1je
tr2n
t3ranje.
tra1n2j
tra3nje
3tranje1g
3tranjem
t3ra3nja
3tranj2o.
tran1jo
tras3ti
trast2
1tra1je
3trajne.
traj1n
traš1n
1tr2k
t1ro2k.
t1ro1ke
t1ro1ka
t1ro1ki
t1ro1vi
t3ro2s2t.
trost2
3tro1stn
t1roč
1trob
tro1š
tr2de
trd2
trinaj3sti
tri1na
trinajst2
trik1r
tris1
1trg2
tr2li
tr1s2
1tr1sko
trsk2
1tr1ta
1ti1a
tivno3sti
tiv1n
tivno2st2
1tir.
ti1g
ti2pl
1til1c
ti1sk2
tis1ta
tist2
1tita
ti1t
ti2tve
tit2v
1ti2tl
ti1žn
ti1me
1ti1ma
1tijan
ti1ja
1tiš
tiš1či
1tu1a
tu1k
1tur
tu1re
tu1ra
1tud1n
1tus
tu1ta
1tu1je
1tle.
tle1tn
3tlej1ši
tlej1š
t1l2o.
t1los
tlos3ti
tlost2
t1lo1be
1tlob1n
t1lo1ba
t1lobo
t1lo1bi
1t2lih
t1li
1t2li1t
t3lje1ne
tl2j
t3lje1ni
3tlje2ns
t1ljev
4tlji1vo
t3ljiv2o.
2th
tho1
2ts
t1sk2
2tm
t1ma1
t3mo
t2j
t3je1g
1tjin
t3jič
1tjim
1t1f
2č.
1čenem
če1ne
čeni2š
če1ni
čed1n
1če1g
čep1r
1čel
če1le
če1l2j
čes1to
čest2
če1sti
če1tn
če4tnik
čet3ni2k.
če1t2v
če1tr
čet3j
1čez
1čem
1čej
če1š
č1n
č3nos3ti
čnost2
č2ni1š
čan3ska
ča2n1s
čansk2
čan3sk2i.
1ča1ve
1ča1vo
1ča1la
1ča1lo
1ča1li
1čah
ča1sne
ča3stne1g
čast2
ča3stno
ča3stni
čas1ti
1čate
ča1t
1čam.
1ča1mi
1ča1je
ča1ju
čaš1
č1k
čko2
čk1ov3
č3ki
čo1k
čo1p
čvred1
1č2vir1j
č1vi
1čr
čr2ne1g
čr1n
čr2nin
č2r2v
čr1pe
2črpn
2čr2t.
1činah
či1na
čilnos3t2i.
čil1n
čilnost2
čis1
3čite1ne
či1t
3čiten2i.
čite1ni
či3tne
či2tn
či3tna
či3tno
či3tn2i.
čit3nik
3čitni2k.
3čitni1ka
3čit1nim
3čitni1c
1čito
či2t2v
čit3ve
či1me
či1šk
1či2c.
či1c
1čico
1ču
ču1ni
3čuv
čud1n
ču1ste
čust2
ču1te
čut1na
ču1tno1
ču1to
člet1n
člos1
1čl2j
č1b
č1m
č1jem
čjos1
č1jo
1čji1mi
2b.
1be.
1ben
1be1g
be2g1n
be1le
be1lo1
1be1li
be1l2j
be1sno
bez3n2i.
1bem
beš1
b1n
b4nejš2i.
bnej1š
bnej1ši
bnav1
bnovit3v
bno1vi
bnovi1t
bnov3l
bnos3tih
bnost2
bni1š
1ba
3b2a.
ban1č
ba1vl
bar2s2
ba1s
ba1z
b1ke
b1ka
b1ko
bkos3ti
bkost2
b1ki
1b2o.
1bok
bo1ko
bo1ks
1bov
bo1vl
bori3šče
bo1ri
bori3šča
bori3šči
bor1s2
bo3dne.
bo3dne1g
bod1na
bod1no
bod1ni
bod3l
bog1l
bo1h
1bos
bo1sn
bo1sa
bo1su
bos1te
bost2
bos1ta
bos1ti
bot1n
botav1
bo1ta
1boč
bo1čj
bož1ne
bož1no
božnos3
1bom
boji3šče
bo1ji
boji3šča
boš3či1ne
b1v
bve3st2i.
bvest2
b1re.
1bre1na
b1re1no
1bre1ni
b1re1di
bre1s
brez1n
b1rem.
bremeni3t
bre1me
breme1ni
1brejs
b1rej1š
1brna
br1n
1brno
3bra3te
bra1t
bra3tn
b1rač
b1ra1b
b1ra1z2l
1braz1b2
b1r2o.
b1ro2k.
1brov
1bro1de
1bro1do
1b2ros
b1rot
b1rob
b1rin
b1rik
b1rih
b1riti
bri1t
3brižnos3
briž1n
b1rim
1bru2h.
3bruhni2l.
bruh1n
1bru1ha
1bru1hu
br1tno
brt2n
br3tnih
b1d
bdob1j
b1do
1b2i.
1bin
1biv
1bid
bilno3sti
bil1n
bilnost2
bil1s
1bih
bi1s
bi3tn
bi1t
bi2t3j
bi1b
bi1št
1bu.
1buk
bu1ka
bu1ki
bud1no
bu1pn
bu1pa
1bus
bu1sn
bu1st2
bu1to
bu1če
bu1b
bu1me
bu1š
1ble.
b1lek
ble1tn
ble1š
b1la1ka
b3lakom
bla1ko
b1la1ku
b3la2s2t.
blast2
bla3ste
b3las3t2i.
3bla3sti1la
b1lač
3bla3š2če1ni
blaš1če
blo1
b2li
1bl2i.
blikan3
bli1ka
b3likah
b3likova2n.
bli1ko
bliko1v2a
b3likuje.
bli1ku
bliku1je
b3lič
3bližek
b4li1že
bliš3ča
b1lj2a.
bl2j
1bljan
3blja2l.
3blja1le
3blja1la
3blja1lo
3bljata
blja1t
b3ljati
b3lja2j.
b1lji
b4ljubil
blju1bi
bljub3l
b1s
bse3žni
b1se
b2st2
b3sta1nek
bsta3ne
b3staja1lo
bsta1ja
b3stajati
bstaja1t
b1te1ni
b1tni
b1to
bto1žn
b1ti
b1č
bče1s
bčas3no
bča3sni
bčut3j
b1ču
b1z
b1ž
b1m
b1mo1
b1jed
b1jes
b1ja
bjav2
bja1vl
b1ji
b1š
b2šl
b1c
2z.
1ze.
ze2n1s
1ze1le
ze1li1
ze1l2j
zet1n
ze1tje
zet2j
1zet3ju
3zema2l.
ze1ma
2ze1mu
z1nel
3znane1g
zna3ne
3znanih
zna3ni
3zna2n2j.
zna1n2j
1zna1ve
3znavna
znav1n
3znav4an
zna1v2a
3z4naval1c
z3naval
3znavaj2o.
znava1jo
z4na1la
z1na1lo
3znamova1la
zna1mo
znamo1v2a
1zna1mu
zna3šla
3z4nova1n2j
zno1v2a
1zno1vr1
3znoli1ko
zno1li
znot1
1znik
1zni1vo1
z1nij
zni1š
2z3ni2št2v
1zn2j
1za
zak1r
za1kle
zao1k
za1o
zav1l
za2p4ra3vi
zap3ra
za3pravi1li
za3pl
za1l2j
zas4n
za3sno1vi
zas1le
za1slo
za3stop
zast2
za4s4to1p2a.
zasto1pa
zas1m
za2tr
za1t
za1ča1
za1be
zab3lje1ni
zabl2j
zab3lja
za3zn2a.
za1zr
za1mo1
zk2
z1ke
z1ka
z1ko
zkori3sti2l.
zko1ri
zkorist2
zkori3stij
zkot1
zkotnos3
z1k2r3v
z3kriv2a.
zkri1v2a
z3krivaj
z3kriti
zkri1t
z1krc
z1ku
z1kl2j
1z2o.
zo1ne
zo2n1s
zornos3ti
zor1n
zornost2
zori1š
zo1ri
z1o2d.
z1o1da
z1o1do
z1o1di
z3o3gni2l.
zo2gn
z3o3gni1t
zo1p
1zoč
z1o1br
zo1bi
z1o1bl
1zo1z
zv2
zved3la
zves3t2o.
zvest2
zves3ti
zve4zni
zve1zn
zvez3n2i.
z1vor
zvo1dn
z1vol
z2vra2
zvr3sti
zvrs2
zvrst2
z1vrš2
zvi1d
z1vi
z1vp2
zrek1l
1zre2d.
z1re1de
z1redn
zre3dne
zred3no
zre3dni
1zre1da
1zre1do
1zre1di
1zre1du
zre3zlja3ne
zrezl2j
z1re1š
zr2n
zras1l
zra3stej
zras3te
zrast2
zrab1l
3zročij
zro1či
1zrt
zd2
zdelnos3
z1de
zdel1n
zdeli4t2v
zde1li
zdeli1t
z1dna
z1dn2i.
z1dnih
zdr2
z1d3ju
zd1j
1z2i.
1zin
1ziv
1zil
zil1s
1zih
z1i1s
1zi1t
1zib
z3i3šče.
3ziš1čej
1zu
zu1p
z1u1č
zu1me
zum1n
zu1mrl
z1u1mi
zgu3b4lj2a.
z1gu
zgub1l
zgubl2j
z3gla1še
z1pa
zpore4d3no
zpo1re
zpore3dn
zpos4
zpo3s4tavi1t
zpos3tav
zpost2
zposta3vi
zpoz1
zprav2
zpra3vl
z1pi
z1pu
zpuš4
z3plačan
zpla1ča
zlas1
3z2logov
zlo1go
1z2lo1že
zloš1
1z2li1t
z1li
z3lja3ni
zl2j
z3lji1vi
zhod3nih
z1se1
z1sr
z1su
z1sl
z1st2
zsta3vl
z1te
ztek1
zte2g1n
zte1g
z1to
z1tres
z1č
zb2
z1bij
z2bl
zz2
z1zo
z1zi
z1ž
zmes1t2
zme1t
z1mn
zmo3tno
z1mo
zmo3žno2s2t.
zmožnost2
zmož3ni
zmi3s4l2i.
z1mi
zmis1li
zmi1š
z1j
zje1
zjav1l
zš2
z1ce
z1ci
1že
ženos1
že1no
žen3ske1g
že2ns
žensk2
žen3skem
žen3skih
žen2st2
ževno3sti
žev1n
ževno2st2
3že3va1t
že1v2a
že1le
žet3v
žez1
ž1nem
ž1nej
3žno1stn
žnost2
žnos3t2i.
3žno3stih
3žnos2t3m
ž1ni1ke
3ž4niko1ve
žni1ko
ž1nim
ž1niš1
3ž2njev.
žn2j
ž1nje1g
3žnjem.
1žnj2a.
1žnjih
1ža
žan2sk2
ža2n1s
žan3sko
žavnos3
žav1n
2ža3vi
ža1vl
žališ1
ža1li
ža1l2j
ža1me1
ža1ju
ž1k
1žo
1žr1le
1žr1la
1žr1li
1ži
ži1k
ž1is
ži2t1n
ži1t
ži2tve
žit2v
ž1i1šč
1žu1
žgo1
žljivos3ti
žl2j
žlji1vo
žljivost2
ž1b
ž1m
1žma
ž1j
meno1s
me1no
me2n1s
1mek
1mev
3merje1ne
mer1j
3merjev
3merj2a.
3merjal
med1n
med3l
me2g1l
me1g
me1le
1mehni
meh1n
1me1ha
1me1ho
1me1hu
me3stna
mest2
mes1ta
mes1to
me4tnos
met3no2s2t.
metnost2
metno3st2i.
me1tr
met3j
met1ja
met1ju
me1z
1me1ž2
me1šn
me1šk
me1šč
1mec
1mne1ve
1mnev1n
3mnev2a.
mne1v2a
3mnevaj2o.
mneva1jo
1mne1vo
m1nel
m1net
m1na
mnaj3sti
mnajst2
m1nov
1mnol
1mnin
1mnik
1mnil1n
m1ni1la
m1ni1li
m1nim
m1nij
m1niš
1mnu
1m2a.
ma2n
ma3na
1mar.
1mar1j
ma3g
ma2gn
ma4gl
mas1l
1mač
ma1z
1maž
ma1ml
ma1ju
1maš
maš1n
1ma1c
m1k
mkaj3
1mo
mo1ne
mo1k
3movje
mov1j
mo1dn
mod1r
mo1gr
mog1le
3mo3glavi1lo
mogla3vi
mo1gl2j
moli2t3v
mo1li
moli1t
mo1lč2
mo1sk2
mo1sv
mo1st2
mo4s3tojn2o.
mo1stoj
mo3stoj1n
mos3tojn2i.
mo4stojni
mot1ni
mo1če
mo1b
mo1žna
mož3n2o.
mož3nosti
možnost2
mo1žg
moj1s
moš3ke.
mo3ške1g
mo3š4kem.
mo1ško
moš3k2i.
moš3kih
mo1št
m1v
2mre
m1rej
mrnos1
mr1n
mra1v4
mr1lo
1mr3til
mr1ti
3mrtiti
mrti1t
1mrtij
1mrč2
mr1zn
mrz2
mr1š2
m1d
1mi
min4ske
mi2n1s
minsk2
min2ska
mi1kr
mivo3sti
mi1vo
mivost2
mi1gr
mis1la
mi1sti
mist2
mi1šk
1mu
mu1n
m2u1l
mu1s2
mu1t
mu1č
m1pe
m1pa
m1po
m1pr
m1pi
m1pu
1mla
2mlaj1še
mlaj1š
2mlje.
ml2j
3mlje2n.
3mljenos
mlje1no
1mljan
m2ljal
m3lja1le
3mlja1la
3m1lja1li
1mlja1t
m1ljaj
m1lj2i.
3mljine.
mlji1ne
3mlji1no
m3ljiv.
m3lji1ve
1mljih
3mlji1šk
3mljiš2č.
3mlji3šče
m1sk2
m1t
m1č
m1be
mb4no
mb1n
mbnos3ti
mbnost2
m1bo
m1bro
m1bi
m1bu
m1bl
1mj
m1š
m1f
m1c
2j.
jek1la
je3kl2o.
je1dr
jed1l
1jel
je1le
jes1ti
jest2
jet1na
je3tnos
jetno3sti
jetnost2
jet1ni
je1tr
je1t2j
jez1n
je1mn
j1n
jno1g
jniš1k
jni1št
jan4st2
ja2n1s
jak2
ja1k1n
jako3sti
ja1ko
jakost2
javno3sti
jav1n
javno2st2
javno3st2j
ja4v3lje2n.
javl2j
ja3vlj2a.
jali3šče
ja1li
jal1s
jas1ne
jas3n2i.
ja1st2
jaz1na
ja3zn2o.
jaž2
ja1žn
ja1šn
ja2š1ko
ja1šk
ja2š3k2i.
j1k
jka1
1jo
jo1ne
jo1k
3josti
jost2
jo1če
j1v
jverje3
jver1j
jve3čje1g
jve3č2jo
jveč3ji
jvod1s
j2v1p2
j1r
jra1
jraz2
j1di1
j1dl
ji1sta
jist2
ji1sto
ji1sti
ji1ž
ji1šk
jiš3ču
ju1ni
ju1dn
ju1g
ju1s2
jut1
ju1če
juče1no3
ju1či
ju1čj
ju1bi
juž1
jglas1
j1glo1
j1po
jpog1l
j1l
jh2
j1he
j1si
j1sl
j1stn
jst2
j1st2a.
j1str
j1t
jtem1
j1če
jč2ne
jč1n
j1b2
j1z
2j1m
j1š
j2šn
j2št
j2šč
j1c
2š.
1še
šenos3ti
še1no
šenost2
še1v3s
še1le
še1sta
šest2
šes1to
še3st2i.
še3stim
š1nos
šnos3ti
šnost2
1š2ni1c
1šnjem
šn2j
š4nja1v2a
3šnjav2a.
1šnjih
1ša
š4kem.
škan3
3škodova2n.
ško1do
škodo1v2a
3škodovanih
škodova3ni
1ško1du
1škod1b
1šo
š2v
1ši
ši1s
3šitev
ši1t
ši2t3v
3šij
ši1šk
1šu
šu1t
š2p
š1ljev
šl2j
š1ljaj
š1lju
1šte.
š1te2n.
1šte1na
š1te1ni
3š4tevam
šte1v2a
1šta
1št2o.
3štova1n2j
što1v2a
š3toval
3što3va1t
1štvih
št2v
št1vi
1št2j
š3čenos
šče1no
š1čet
1šča3vi
1ščad
1ščal1k2
1šči2n.
3ščite2n.
šči1t
3ščite1na
3ščite1no
3ščitenih
ščite1ni
3šči3tne
šči2tn
3šči3tna
3šči3tno
3šči3tn2i.
3šči1ti1t
š2ču
š1j
š3jem
š3ju
2f.
fe1l
fe1s
fe1b
f1n
1fa
fa1z
1fo
fo2n1s
fo1v2s
fre1
fra1s
fri1
1fi
fi1s
1fu
f2l
fle1
f1s
f1t
1fj
2c.
cenos3ti
ce1no
cenost2
ce1dn
ced1r
cep1l
ce1le
ce2lj1s
cel2j
ce1stn
cest2
ces1to
cem1b
2c1n
1ca
3ca1lo
2c1k
co1l
co1s
co1š
1cve2t.
cve1tn
ci1k2
ci3t
ci1me
1cu
c2h
